Nevada, session 83, SB433.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 116 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. “Bullying” means written, verbal or electronic
expressions or physical acts or gestures, or any combination
thereof, that are directed at a person or group of persons, or a
single severe and willful act or expression that is directed at a
person or group of persons, and:
(a) Have the effect of:
(1) Physically harming a person or damaging the property
of a person; or
(2) Placing a person in reasonable fear of physical harm to
the person or damage to the property of the person;
(b) Interfere with the rights of a person by:
(1) Creating an intimidating or hostile environment for the
person; or
(2) Substantially interfering with the ability of the person to
participate in or benefit from services, activities or privileges
provided by an association; or
-
*SB433*

– 5 –
(c) Are acts or conduct described in paragraph (a) or (b) and
are based upon the:
(1) Actual or perceived race, color, national origin,
ancestry, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual
orientation, physical or mental disability of a person, sex or any
other distinguishing characteristic or background of a person; or
(2) Association of a person with another person having one
or more of those actual or perceived characteristics.
2. The term includes, without limitation:
(a) Repeated or pervasive taunting, name-calling, belittling,
mocking or use of put-downs or demeaning humor regarding the
actual or perceived race, color, national origin, ancestry, religion,
gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, physical or
mental disability of a person, sex or any other distinguishing
characteristic or background of a person;
(b) Behavior that is intended to harm another person by
damaging or manipulating his or her relationships with others by
conduct that includes, without limitation, spreading false rumors;
(c) Repeated or pervasive nonverbal threats or intimidation
such as the use of aggressive, menacing or disrespectful gestures;
(d) Threats of harm to a person, to his or her possessions or to
other persons, whether such threats are transmitted verbally,
electronically or in writing;
(e) Blackmail, extortion or demands for protection money or
involuntary loans or donations;
(f) Unlawfully blocking access to any property or facility of a
common-interest community;
(g) Stalking; and
(h) Physically harmful contact with or injury to another
person or his or her property.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Protective hairstyle” includes, without limitation,
hairstyles such as natural hairstyles, afros, bantu knots, curls,
braids, locs and twists.
(b) “Race” includes traits associated with race, including,
without limitation, hair texture and protective hairstyles.
Sec. 3. “Building official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 278.0115.
Sec. 4. “Corrective repair” means repairs or other
corrections to be undertaken following the detection of:
1. A potential failure;
2. Deterioration; or
3. A condition that may lead to premature deterioration,
-
*SB433*

– 6 –
 of the primary load-bearing system of a covered building, as
reported by a structural inspector with the goal of remediating the
condition described in subsection 1, 2 or 3.
Sec. 5. “Covered building” means a residential building in a
common-interest community that is greater than three stories in
height and constructed, without limitation:
1. With load-bearing concrete, masonry, steel, heavy timber
or podium decks; or
2. As a hybrid structure.
Sec. 6. “Covered building owner” means:
1. A person whose name appears in the register or other
records of a county clerk as the owner of record of a covered
building; or
2. An association of a common-interest community which
includes a covered building.
Sec. 7. “Cyber-bullying” means bullying through the use of
electronic communication. As used in this section, “electronic
communication” means the communication of any written, verbal
or pictorial information through the use of an electronic device,
including, without limitation, a telephone, a cellular telephone, a
computer or any similar means of communication.
Sec. 8. “Enforcing agency” means the office of a city or
county building official.
Sec. 9. “Initial structural inspection” means a structural
inspection required or performed pursuant to subsection 1 of
section 17 of this act.
Sec. 10. “Primary load-bearing system” means the
assemblage of structural components within a building that, by
contiguous interconnection, form a path by which external and
internal forces applied to the covered building are delivered to the
ground.
Sec. 11. “Structural inspection” means an inspection
performed by a structural inspector of the building components
forming the primary load-bearing system of a covered building.
Sec. 12. “Structural inspector” means:
1. A building official who is also a professional engineer
licensed as a structural engineer in this State pursuant to chapter
625 of NRS and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto; or
2. A professional engineer licensed as a structural engineer
in this State pursuant to chapter 625 of NRS and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto, with whom a covered building owner or
enforcing agency enters into a contract to perform structural
inspections of covered buildings pursuant to sections 16 to 22,
inclusive, of this act.
-
*SB433*

– 7 –
Sec. 13. “Subsequent structural inspection” means a
structural inspection required or performed pursuant to
subsection 2 of section 17 of this act.
Sec. 14. “Violation” means a violation of:
1. Any provision of this chapter;
2. Any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter; or
3. Any order of the Commission or a hearing panel.
Sec. 15. 1. Notwithstanding the terms of a declaration, a
master deed, the bylaws or any other governing document of an
association, the executive board may, without the consent of the
units’ owners or the approval of a declarant selling units in a
common-interest community, make an assessment payable by the
units’ owners over one or more fiscal years or obtain a loan on
such terms as the executive board determines are reasonable,
including, without limitation, by assigning rights to future income,
whenever necessary to fund the cost of corrective repair of the
primary load-bearing system of a covered building pursuant to
sections 16 to 22, inclusive, of this act or to maintain adequate
reserve funds for an association pursuant to the current study of
the reserves.
2. Before making an assessment or obtaining a loan pursuant
to this section for a corrective repair to a covered building, the
executive board must:
(a) Make a determination that the assessment or loan for the
constructive repair is necessary to maintain the structural integrity
of the covered building; and
(b) Obtain a written report from an engineer licensed by this
State that states that the failure to undertake corrective repair of
the primary load-bearing system of the covered building will:
(1) Constitute an imminent or reasonably foreseeable
hazard to health or safety;
(2) Constitute a violation of the provisions of sections 16 to
22, inclusive, of this act; or
(3) Result in a material increase in the cost of such
corrective repair if delayed.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an
association from pursuing or interfere with the right of an
association to pursue an action for a constructional defect related
to any common element of the common-interest community.
Sec. 16. 1. When an application for a building permit that
proposes to create, amend or modify the primary load-bearing
system of a covered building is filed with an enforcing agency, the
enforcing agency shall, before issuing a building permit, consult
with a structural inspector chosen by the enforcing agency or
covered building owner and, except as otherwise provided in this
-
*SB433*

– 8 –
subsection, establish a schedule of structural inspections to
confirm that the primary load-bearing system conforms to the
plans submitted by the applicant for the building permit.
Inspections must not be required as a condition for the issuance of
a building permit pursuant to this subsection if the structural
inspector consulted by the enforcing agency determines that the
building which is the subject of the application for a building
permit is not in fact a covered building.
2. Structural inspections performed pursuant to a schedule
established pursuant to subsection 1 must be performed under the
direction of a structural inspector. The structural inspector may be
assisted by other licensed professionals who are qualified in
various special disciplines, including, without limitation,
geotechnical and civil engineering practices, as needed to perform
the structural inspections required by this section.
3. In performing a structural inspection pursuant to this
section, a structural inspector shall review the construction plans
submitted with the application for a building permit and issue a
written report which includes a statement whether the primary
load-bearing system of the covered building conforms to the
construction plans. If the structural inspector determines that the
primary load-bearing system does not conform to the construction
plans, the applicant for the building permit shall provide
additional construction plans which conform to the modification
to the primary load-bearing system.
4. The creation, repair, renovation, alteration or modification
of the primary load-bearing system of a covered building required
as a result of any inspection must be inspected by a structural
inspector before a certificate of occupancy may be issued for the
covered building.
5. A certificate of occupancy for a covered building must not
be issued until a structural inspector issues a written report which
includes a statement confirming that the primary load-bearing
system of the covered building conforms to approved construction
plans.
6. Any additional cost to an enforcing agency incurred as a
result of structural inspections performed pursuant to this section
may be recovered through a fee which:
(a) Is associated with an application for a building permit for a
covered building; and
(b) Must be paid by a covered building owner during the
application process.
7. The governing body of a city or county to which an
enforcing agency pertains shall adopt ordinances necessary to
carry out the purposes of this section.
-
*SB433*

– 9 –
Sec. 17. A covered building owner shall retain a structural
inspector to perform:
1. An initial structural inspection of the building components
of the primary load-bearing system of the covered building for
which a certificate of occupancy has been issued not later than the
earlier of:
(a) Five years after the date on which a certificate of
occupancy is issued for the covered building; or
(b) Sixty days after the date on which damage to the primary
load-bearing system is observed.
2. A subsequent structural inspection of the building
components of the primary load-bearing system of the covered
building in accordance with the schedule specified by a structural
inspector in the written report for the most recent structural
inspection as described in paragraph (f) of subsection 2 of section
20 of this act.
Sec. 18. A structural inspection performed pursuant to
sections 16 to 22, inclusive, of this act may be performed in
conjunction with any other required inspection.
Sec. 19. Before undertaking a subsequent structural
inspection of the building components of the primary load-bearing
system of a covered building pursuant to subsection 2 of section 17
of this act, a structural inspector shall review the written report
from the most recent structural inspection of the covered building.
Sec. 20. 1. After a structural inspector has performed a
structural inspection of the building components of the primary
load-bearing system of a covered building pursuant to sections 16
to 22, inclusive, of this act, the structural inspector shall issue a
written report describing the condition of the primary load-bearing
system.
2. A written report issued pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be prepared in accordance with the most recent edition of
Guideline for Structural Condition Assessment of Existing
Buildings, published by the American Society of Civil Engineers
or its successor organization, or a similar protocol established by
another nationally recognized structural engineering
organization;
(b) If the structural inspector finds that corrective repairs of
the primary load-bearing system are required, specify with
reasonable detail the required corrective repairs;
(c) Set forth with specificity any other required preventive
maintenance or repairs needed by the primary load-bearing
system;
(d) Provide any other information or guidance necessary to
maintain or repair the structural integrity of the covered building;
-
*SB433*

– 10 –
(e) Identify any additional inspections and testing that are
recommended based upon the conditions visually observed, which
must be performed not later than 1 year after the date of the
report; and
(f) Specify when the next structural inspection of the primary
load-bearing system must be performed, but in no event shall the
next inspection occur later than the earlier of 60 days after the
date on which damage to the primary load-bearing system is
observed or:
(1) If 20 years or less has elapsed since a certificate of
occupancy was issued for the covered building, 5 years after the
date on which the most recent structural inspection for the covered
building was performed; or
(2) If more than 20 years has elapsed since a certificate of
occupancy was issued for the covered building, 3 years after the
date on which the most recent structural inspection for the covered
building was performed.
3. In addition to the requirements of subsection 2, a written
report for a subsequent structural inspection must:
(a) Identify any new or progressive deterioration; and
(b) If the structural inspector finds that corrective repairs of
the primary load-bearing system are required, specify with
reasonable detail the required corrective repairs, including,
without limitation, the corrective repairs required to address any
new or progressive deterioration identified pursuant to paragraph
(a).
4. A structural inspector who issues a written report pursuant
to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Provide a copy of the report to the covered building owner;
and
(b) File a copy of the report with:
(1) The building official for the jurisdiction in which the
covered building is located;
(2) The enforcing agency for the jurisdiction in which the
covered building is located; and
(3) The Division.
5. A written report issued pursuant to subsection 1 must be:
(a) Upon request of any resident of the covered building which
is the subject of the written report, made available to that resident
by:
(1) The covered building owner;
(2) The enforcing agency for the jurisdiction in which the
covered building is located; and
(3) The Division; and
(b) Included within:
-
*SB433*

– 11 –
(1) A public offering statement of a common-interest
community prepared pursuant to NRS 116.4102; and
(2) A resale package furnished pursuant to NRS 116.4109.
6. A written report which identifies additional inspections and
testing that are recommended based upon conditions visually
observed as described in paragraph (e) of subsection 2 must be
updated to address the necessary repairs or maintenance identified
through any additional inspections and testing which are
performed.
Sec. 21. A covered building owner who receives a written
report of a structural inspection pursuant to section 20 of this act
shall:
1. Undertake measures necessary to effectuate any corrective
repairs specified in the written report, including, without
limitation, engaging the services of:
(a) A person who holds a certificate of registration to practice
architecture in this State pursuant to chapter 623 of NRS; or
(b) A structural engineer,
 who is qualified in structural repairs to create plans or
specifications to implement the corrective repairs.
2. Cause any plans or specifications created pursuant to
subsection 1 to be filed with:
(a) The enforcing agency; and
(b) The Division.
Sec. 22. The Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out
the purposes of sections 16 to 22, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 23. NRS 116.003 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.003 As used in this chapter and in the declaration and
bylaws of an association, the words and terms defined in NRS
116.005 to 116.095, inclusive, and sections 2 to 14, inclusive, of
this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 24. NRS 116.1203 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.1203 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 3, if a planned community contains no more than 12 units and is
not subject to any developmental rights, it is subject only to NRS
116.1106 and 116.1107 unless the declaration provides that this
entire chapter is applicable.
2. The provisions of NRS 116.12065 and the definitions set
forth in NRS 116.005 to 116.095, inclusive, and sections 2 to 14,
inclusive, of this act, to the extent that the definitions are necessary
to construe any of those provisions, apply to a residential planned
community containing more than 6 units.
3. Except for NRS 116.3104, 116.31043, 116.31046 and
116.31138, the provisions of NRS 116.3101 to 116.350, inclusive,
and sections 15 to 22, inclusive, of this act and the definitions set
-
*SB433*

– 12 –
forth in NRS 116.005 to 116.095, inclusive, and sections 2 to 14,
inclusive, of this act, to the extent that such definitions are
necessary in construing any of those provisions, apply to a
residential planned community containing more than 6 units.
Sec. 25. NRS 116.31038 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.31038 In addition to any applicable requirement set forth
in NRS 116.310395, within 30 days after units’ owners other than
the declarant may elect a majority of the members of the executive
board, the declarant shall deliver to the association all property of
the units’ owners and of the association held by or controlled by the
declarant, including:
1. The original or a certified copy of the recorded declaration
as amended, the articles of incorporation, articles of association,
articles of organization, certificate of registration, certificate of
limited partnership, certificate of trust or other documents of
organization for the association, the bylaws, minute books and other
books and records of the association and any rules or regulations
which may have been adopted.
2. An accounting for money of the association and audited
financial statements for each fiscal year and any ancillary period
from the date of the last audit of the association to the date the
period of the declarant’s control ends. The financial statements must
fairly and accurately report the association’s financial position. The
declarant shall pay the costs of the ancillary audit. The ancillary
audit must be delivered within 210 days after the date the period of
the declarant’s control ends.
3. A complete study of the reserves of the association,
conducted by a person who is registered as a reserve study specialist
pursuant to chapter 116A of NRS. At the time the control of the
declarant ends, the declarant shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, deliver to the
association a reserve account that contains the declarant’s share of
the amounts then due, and control of the account. If the declaration
was recorded before October 1, 1999, and, at the time the control of
the declarant ends, the declarant has failed to pay his or her share of
the amounts due, the executive board shall authorize the declarant to
pay the deficiency in installments for a period of 3 years, unless the
declarant and the executive board agree to a shorter period.
(b) Disclose, in writing, the amount by which the declarant has
subsidized the association’s dues on a per unit or per lot basis.
4. The association’s money or control thereof.
5. All of the declarant’s tangible personal property that has
been represented by the declarant as property of the association or,
unless the declarant has disclosed in the public offering statement
-
*SB433*

– 13 –
that all such personal property used in the common-interest
community will remain the declarant’s property, all of the
declarant’s tangible personal property that is necessary for, and has
been used exclusively in, the operation and enjoyment of the
common elements, and inventories of these properties.
6. A copy of any plans and specifications used in the
construction of the improvements to common elements in the
common-interest community . [which were completed within 2
years before the declaration was recorded.]
7. All insurance policies then in force, in which the units’
owners, the association, or its directors and officers are named as
insured persons.
8. Copies of any certificates of occupancy that may have been
issued with respect to any improvements comprising the common-
interest community other than units in a planned community.
9. Any renewable permits and approvals issued by
governmental bodies applicable to the common-interest community
which are in force and any other permits and approvals so issued
and applicable which are required by law to be kept on the premises
of the community.
10. Written warranties of the contractor, subcontractors,
suppliers and manufacturers that are still effective.
11. A roster of owners and mortgagees of units and their
addresses and telephone numbers, if known, as shown on the
declarant’s records.
12. Contracts of employment in which the association is a
contracting party.
13. Any contract for service in which the association is a
contracting party or in which the association or the units’ owners
have any obligation to pay a fee to the persons performing the
services.
14. For any covered building, a manual of preventive
maintenance to be performed over the life of the components of
the common elements, including, without limitation, the primary
load-bearing system. The manual must provide a schedule for the
preventive maintenance, including, without limitation, a minimum
schedule for periodic inspections of the primary load-bearing
system. The declarant shall include in the study of the reserves of
the association required by subsection 3, or the budget of the
association, as appropriate, a statement of the amount of the funds
necessary to perform the preventive maintenance in accordance
with the schedule provided.
Sec. 26. NRS 116.3115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.3115 1. Until the association makes an assessment for
common expenses, the declarant shall pay all common expenses.
-
*SB433*

– 14 –
After an assessment has been made by the association, assessments
must be made at least annually, based on a budget adopted at least
annually by the association in accordance with the requirements set
forth in NRS 116.31151. Unless the declaration imposes more
stringent standards, the budget must include a budget for the daily
operation of the association and a budget for the reserves required
by paragraph (b) of subsection 2.
2. Except for assessments under subsections 4 to 7, inclusive,
or as otherwise provided in this chapter:
(a) All common expenses, including the reserves, must be
assessed against all the units in accordance with the allocations set
forth in the declaration pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of
NRS 116.2107.
(b) The association shall establish adequate reserves, funded on
a reasonable basis, for the repair, replacement and restoration of the
major components of the common elements and any other portion of
the common-interest community that the association is obligated to
maintain, repair, replace or restore. The reserves may be used only
for those purposes, including, without limitation, repairing,
replacing and restoring roofs, roads and sidewalks [,] and
implementing corrective repairs, and must not be used for daily
maintenance. The association may comply with the provisions of
this paragraph through a funding plan that is designed to allocate the
costs for the repair, replacement and restoration of the major
components of the common elements and any other portion of the
common-interest community that the association is obligated to
maintain, repair, replace or restore over a period of years if the
funding plan is designed in an actuarially sound manner which will
ensure that sufficient money is available when the repair,
replacement and restoration of the major components of the
common elements or any other portion of the common-interest
community that the association is obligated to maintain, repair,
replace or restore are necessary. Notwithstanding any provision of
the governing documents to the contrary, to establish adequate
reserves pursuant to this paragraph, including, without limitation, to
establish or carry out a funding plan, the executive board may,
without seeking or obtaining the approval of the units’ owners,
impose any necessary and reasonable assessments against the units
in the common-interest community. Any such assessments imposed
by the executive board must be based on the study of the reserves of
the association conducted pursuant to NRS 116.31152 [.] and any
written report of a structural inspector issued pursuant to section
20 of this act.
3. Any assessment for common expenses or installment thereof
that is 60 days or more past due bears interest at a rate equal to the
-
*SB433*

– 15 –
prime rate at the largest bank in Nevada as ascertained by the
Commissioner of Financial Institutions on January 1 or July 1, as
the case may be, immediately preceding the date the assessment
becomes past due, plus 2 percent. The rate must be adjusted
accordingly on each January 1 and July 1 thereafter until the balance
is satisfied.
4. Except as otherwise provided in the governing documents:
(a) Any common expense associated with the maintenance,
repair, restoration or replacement of a limited common element
must be assessed against the units to which that limited common
element is assigned, equally, or in any other proportion the
declaration provides;
(b) Any common expense benefiting fewer than all of the units
or their owners, including, without limitation, common expenses
consisting of the payment, on behalf of a unit’s owner, of delinquent
property taxes or utility charges owed by the unit’s owner, may be
assessed exclusively against the units or units’ owners benefited;
and
(c) The costs of insurance must be assessed in proportion to risk
and the costs of utilities must be assessed in proportion to usage.
5. Assessments to pay a judgment against the association may
be made only against the units in the common-interest community at
the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their liabilities
for common expenses.
6. If damage to a unit or other part of the common-interest
community, or if any other common expense is caused by the willful
misconduct or gross negligence of any unit’s owner, tenant or
invitee of a unit’s owner or tenant, the association may assess that
expense exclusively against his or her unit, even if the association
maintains insurance with respect to that damage or common
expense, unless the damage or other common expense is caused by a
vehicle and is committed by a person who is delivering goods to, or
performing services for, the unit’s owner, tenant or invitee of the
unit’s owner or tenant.
7. The association of a common-interest community created
before January 1, 1992, is not required to make an assessment
against a vacant lot located within the community that is owned by
the declarant.
8. If liabilities for common expenses are reallocated,
assessments for common expenses and any installment thereof not
yet due must be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated
liabilities.
9. The association shall provide written notice to each unit’s
owner of a meeting at which an assessment for a capital
-
*SB433*

– 16 –
improvement is to be considered or action is to be taken on such an
assessment at least 21 calendar days before the date of the meeting.
Sec. 27. NRS 116.31152 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.31152 1. The executive board shall:
(a) At least once every 5 years, cause to be conducted a study of
the reserves required to repair, replace and restore the major
components of the common elements and any other portion of the
common-interest community that the association is obligated to
maintain, repair, replace or restore;
(b) At least annually, review the results of that study to
determine whether those reserves are sufficient; and
(c) At least annually, make any adjustments to the association’s
funding plan which the executive board deems necessary to provide
adequate funding for the required reserves.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the study of
the reserves required by subsection 1 must be conducted by a person
who holds a permit issued pursuant to chapter 116A of NRS. If the
common-interest community contains 20 or fewer units and is
located in a county whose population is less than 55,000, the study
of the reserves required by subsection 1 may be conducted by any
person whom the executive board deems qualified to conduct the
study.
3. The study of the reserves must include, without limitation:
(a) A summary of an inspection of the major components of the
common elements and any other portion of the common-interest
community that the association is obligated to maintain, repair,
replace or restore;
(b) An identification of the major components of the common
elements and any other portion of the common-interest community
that the association is obligated to maintain, repair, replace or
restore which have a remaining useful life of less than 30 years;
(c) An estimate of the remaining useful life of each major
component of the common elements and any other portion of the
common-interest community that the association is obligated to
maintain, repair, replace or restore identified pursuant to paragraph
(b);
(d) An estimate of the cost of maintenance, repair, replacement
or restoration of each major component of the common elements
and any other portion of the common-interest community identified
pursuant to paragraph (b) during and at the end of its useful life;
[and]
(e) An estimate of the costs associated with implementing any
corrective repairs deemed necessary pursuant to a written report
-
*SB433*

– 17 –
of a structural inspector issued pursuant to section 20 of this act;
and
(f) An estimate of the total annual assessment that may be
necessary to cover the cost of maintaining, repairing, replacement or
restoration of the major components of the common elements and
any other portion of the common-interest community identified
pursuant to paragraph (b), including, without limitation, the
estimate of the costs described in paragraph (e), after subtracting
the reserves of the association as of the date of the study, and an
estimate of the funding plan that may be necessary to provide
adequate funding for the required reserves.
4. A summary of the study of the reserves required by
subsection 1 must be submitted to the Division not later than 45
days after the date that the executive board adopts the results of the
study.
5. If a common-interest community was developed as part of a
planned unit development pursuant to chapter 278A of NRS and is
subject to an agreement with a city or county to receive credit
against the amount of the residential construction tax that is imposed
pursuant to NRS 278.4983 and 278.4985, the association that is
organized for the common-interest community may use the money
from that credit for the repair, replacement or restoration of park
facilities and related improvements if:
(a) The park facilities and related improvements are identified as
major components of the common elements of the association; and
(b) The association is obligated to repair, replace or restore the
park facilities and related improvements in accordance with the
study of the reserves required by subsection 1.
Sec. 28. NRS 116.31175 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.31175 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
the executive board of an association shall, upon the written request
of a unit’s owner, make available the books, records and other
papers of the association for review at the business office of the
association or a designated business location not to exceed 60 miles
from the physical location of the common-interest community and
during the regular working hours of the association, including,
without limitation:
(a) The financial statement of the association;
(b) The budgets of the association required to be prepared
pursuant to NRS 116.31151;
(c) The study of the reserves of the association required to be
conducted pursuant to NRS 116.31152; and
-
*SB433*

– 18 –
(d) All contracts to which the association is a party and all
records filed with a court relating to a civil or criminal action to
which the association is a party.
2. The executive board shall provide a copy of any of the
records described in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1 to a
unit’s owner or the Ombudsman within 21 days after receiving a
written request therefor. Such records must be provided in electronic
format [at no charge to the unit’s owner] or, if the association is
unable to provide the records in electronic format, [the] in paper
format. The executive board may charge a fee to cover the actual
costs of preparing a copy, but the fee may not exceed 25 cents per
page for the first 10 pages, and 10 cents per page thereafter.
3. If the executive board fails to provide a copy of any of the
records pursuant to subsection 2 within 21 days, the executive board
must pay a penalty of $25 for each day the executive board fails to
provide the records.
4. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) The personnel records of the employees of the association,
[except for those records] including, without limitation,
information relating to [the number of hours worked and] the
salaries and benefits of [those] the employees [;] and any other
information concerning the employees;
(b) The records of the association relating to another unit’s
owner, including, without limitation, any architectural plan or
specification submitted by a unit’s owner to the association during
an approval process required by the governing documents, except
for those records described in subsection 5; and
(c) Any document, including, without limitation, minutes of an
executive board meeting, a reserve study and a budget, if the
document:
(1) Is in the process of being developed for final
consideration by the executive board; and
(2) Has not been placed on an agenda for final approval by
the executive board.
5. The executive board of an association shall maintain a
general record concerning each violation of the governing
documents, other than a violation involving a failure to pay an
assessment, for which the executive board has imposed a fine, a
construction penalty or any other sanction. The general record:
(a) Must contain a general description of the nature of the
violation and the type of the sanction imposed. If the sanction
imposed was a fine or construction penalty, the general record must
specify the amount of the fine or construction penalty.
(b) Must not contain the name or address of the person against
whom the sanction was imposed or any other personal information
-
*SB433*

– 19 –
which may be used to identify the person or the location of the unit,
if any, that is associated with the violation.
(c) Must be maintained in an organized and convenient filing
system or data system that allows a unit’s owner to search and
review the general records concerning violations of the governing
documents.
6. If the executive board refuses to allow a unit’s owner to
review the books, records or other papers of the association, the
Ombudsman may:
(a) On behalf of the unit’s owner and upon written request,
review the books, records or other papers of the association during
the regular working hours of the association; and
(b) If the Ombudsman is denied access to the books, records or
other papers, request the Commission, or any member thereof acting
on behalf of the Commission, to issue a subpoena for their
production.
7. The books, records and other papers of an association must
be maintained for at least 10 years. The provisions of this subsection
do not apply to:
(a) The minutes of a meeting of the units’ owners which must be
maintained in accordance with NRS 116.3108; or
(b) The minutes of a meeting of the executive board which must
be maintained in accordance with NRS 116.31083.
8. The executive board [shall not] may require a unit’s owner
to pay [an amount in excess of $25 per hour] the actual costs
incurred by the association for the unit’s owner to review any
books, records, contracts or other papers of the association pursuant
to the provisions of subsection 1.
9. As used in this section, “actual costs” include, without
limitation:
(a) The cost of gathering, preparing, copying or providing
records, regardless of format;
(b) The cost of retrieving records from storage; and
(c) Any other related cost incurred by the association in
allowing a unit’s owner to review any books, records, contracts or
other papers of the association.
Sec. 29. NRS 116.31183 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.31183 1. An executive board, a member of an executive
board, a community manager or an officer, employee or agent of an
association shall not take, or direct or encourage another person to
take, any retaliatory action against a unit’s owner because the unit’s
owner has:
-
*SB433*

– 20 –
(a) Complained in good faith about any alleged violation of any
provision of this chapter or the governing documents of the
association;
(b) Recommended the selection or replacement of an attorney,
community manager or vendor; or
(c) Requested in good faith to review the books, records or other
papers of the association.
2. A unit’s owner, tenant of a unit’s owner or guest or invitee
of a unit’s owner or tenant of a unit’s owner shall not take, or
direct or encourage another person to take, any retaliatory action
against an executive board, a member of an executive board, a
community manager or an officer, employee or agent of an
association because the executive board, community manager or
officer, employee or agent of an association has:
(a) Provided in good faith a unit’s owner or tenant with notice
of the applicable provisions of law or governing documents of the
association that form the basis of an alleged violation;
(b) Failed in good faith to respond to a request or demand
within the prescribed period pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter or the governing documents of the association; or
(c) Refused in good faith to provide confidential information
of the association upon request or to otherwise engage in an
unlawful activity.
3. In addition to any other remedy provided by law, upon a
violation of this section, a unit’s owner , an executive board, a
member of an executive board, a community manager or an
officer, employee or agent of an association may bring a separate
action to recover:
(a) Compensatory damages; and
(b) Attorney’s fees and costs of bringing the separate action.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Retaliatory action” includes, without limitation, making
defamatory statements on social media or another similar online
platform.
(b) “Social media” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 232.003.
Sec. 30. NRS 116.31184 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.31184 1. A community manager, an agent or employee
of the community manager, a member of the executive board, an
officer, employee or agent of an association, a unit’s owner or a
guest or tenant of a unit’s owner shall not willfully and without legal
authority threaten, harass or otherwise engage in bullying, cyber-
bullying or a course of conduct against any other person who is the
community manager of his or her common-interest community or an
-
*SB433*

– 21 –
agent or employee of that community manager, a member of the
executive board of his or her association, an officer, employee or
agent of his or her association, another unit’s owner in his or her
common-interest community or a guest or tenant of a unit’s owner
in his or her common-interest community which:
(a) Causes harm or serious emotional distress, or the reasonable
apprehension thereof, to that person; or
(b) Creates a hostile environment for that person.
2. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
Sec. 31. NRS 116.4103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.4103 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
116.41035, a public offering statement must set forth or fully and
accurately disclose each of the following:
(a) The name and principal address of the declarant and of the
common-interest community, and a statement that the common-
interest community is a condominium, cooperative or planned
community.
(b) A general description of the common-interest community,
including to the extent possible, the types, number and declarant’s
schedule of commencement and completion of construction of
buildings, and amenities that the declarant anticipates including in
the common-interest community.
(c) The estimated number of units in the common-interest
community.
(d) Copies of the declaration, bylaws, and any rules or
regulations of the association, but a plat is not required.
(e) The financial information required by subsection 2.
(f) A description of any services or subsidies being provided by
the declarant or an affiliate of the declarant, not reflected in the
budget that the declarant provides, or expenses which the declarant
pays and which the declarant expects may become at any
subsequent time a common expense of the association and the
projected common expense assessment attributable to each of those
services or expenses for the association and for each type of unit.
(g) Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser or seller at
closing, including, without limitation, any transfer fees, whether
payable to the association, the community manager of the
association or any third party, together with a description of the
purpose and method of calculating the fee.
(h) The terms and significant limitations of any warranties
provided by the declarant, including statutory warranties and
limitations on the enforcement thereof or on damages.
(i) A statement that unless the purchaser or his or her agent has
personally inspected the unit, the purchaser may cancel, by written
-
*SB433*

– 22 –
notice, his or her contract for purchase until midnight of the fifth
calendar day following the date of execution of the contract, and the
contract must contain a provision to that effect.
(j) A statement of any unsatisfied judgment or pending action
against the association, and the status of any pending action material
to the common-interest community of which a declarant has actual
knowledge.
(k) Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid by units’
owners for the use of the common elements and other facilities
related to the common-interest community.
(l) In addition to any other document, a statement describing all
current and expected fees or charges for each unit, including,
without limitation, association fees, fines, assessments, late charges
or penalties, interest rates on delinquent assessments, additional
costs for collecting past due fines and charges for opening or closing
any file for each unit.
(m) Any restraints on alienation of any portion of the common-
interest community and any restrictions:
(1) On the leasing or renting of units; and
(2) On the amount for which a unit may be sold or on the
amount that may be received by a unit’s owner on the sale or
condemnation of or casualty loss to the unit or to the common-
interest community, or on termination of the common-interest
community.
(n) A description of any arrangement described in NRS
116.1209 binding the association.
(o) The information statement set forth in NRS 116.41095.
(p) A copy of every written report from structural inspections
of the building components forming the primary load-bearing
systems of covered buildings located in the common-interest
community, if any, performed pursuant to sections 16 to 22,
inclusive, of this act.
2. The public offering statement must contain any current
balance sheet and a projected budget for the association, either
within or as an exhibit to the public offering statement, for 1 year
after the date of the first conveyance to a purchaser, and thereafter
the current budget of the association, a statement of who prepared
the budget and a statement of the budget’s assumptions concerning
occupancy and inflation factors. The budget must include:
(a) A statement of the amount included in the budget as a
reserve for repairs, replacement and restoration pursuant to
NRS 116.3115;
(b) A statement of any other reserves;
(c) The projected common expense assessment by category of
expenditures for the association; and
-
*SB433*

– 23 –
(d) The projected monthly common expense assessment for each
type of unit, including the amount established as reserves pursuant
to NRS 116.3115.
3. A declarant is not required to revise a public offering
statement more than once each calendar quarter, if the following
warning is given prominence in the statement: “THIS PUBLIC
OFFERING STATEMENT IS CURRENT AS OF (insert a
specified date). RECENT DEVELOPMENTS REGARDING (here
refer to particular provisions of NRS 116.4103 and 116.4105) MAY
NOT BE REFLECTED IN THIS STATEMENT.”
Sec. 32. NRS 116.4109 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.4109 1. Except in the case of a sale in which delivery of
a public offering statement is required, or unless exempt under
subsection 2 of NRS 116.4101, a unit’s owner or his or her
authorized agent shall, at the expense of the unit’s owner, furnish to
a purchaser a resale package containing all of the following:
(a) A copy of the declaration, other than any plats, the bylaws,
the rules or regulations of the association and the information
statement required by NRS 116.41095.
(b) A statement from the association setting forth the amount of
the monthly assessment for common expenses and any unpaid
obligation of any kind, including, without limitation, management
fees, transfer fees, fines, penalties, interest, collection costs,
foreclosure fees and attorney’s fees currently due from the selling
unit’s owner.
(c) A copy of the current operating budget of the association and
current year-to-date financial statement for the association, which
must include a summary of the reserves of the association required
by NRS 116.31152 and which must include, without limitation, a
summary of the information described in paragraphs (a) to [(e),] (f),
inclusive, of subsection 3 of NRS 116.31152.
(d) A statement of any unsatisfied judgments or pending legal
actions against the association and the status of any pending legal
actions relating to the common-interest community of which the
unit’s owner has actual knowledge.
(e) A statement of any transfer fees, transaction fees or any other
fees associated with the resale of a unit.
(f) In addition to any other document, a statement describing all
current and expected fees or charges for each unit, including,
without limitation, association fees, fines, assessments, late charges
or penalties, interest rates on delinquent assessments, additional
costs for collecting past due fines and charges for opening or closing
any file for each unit.
(g) A copy of every written report from structural inspections
of the building components forming the primary load-bearing
-
*SB433*

– 24 –
systems of covered buildings located in the common-interest
community, if any, performed pursuant to sections 16 to 22,
inclusive, of this act.
2. The purchaser may, by written notice, cancel the contract of
purchase until midnight of the fifth calendar day following the date
of receipt of the resale package described in subsection 1, and the
contract for purchase must contain a provision to that effect. If the
purchaser elects to cancel a contract pursuant to this subsection,
the purchaser must hand deliver the notice of cancellation to the
unit’s owner or his or her authorized agent, mail the notice of
cancellation by prepaid United States mail to the unit’s owner or his
or her authorized agent or deliver the notice of cancellation by
electronic transmission to the unit’s owner or his or her authorized
agent. Cancellation is without penalty, and all payments made by
the purchaser before cancellation must be refunded promptly. If the
purchaser has accepted a conveyance of the unit, the purchaser is
not entitled to:
(a) Cancel the contract pursuant to this subsection; or
(b) Damages, rescission or other relief based solely on the
ground that the unit’s owner or his or her authorized agent failed to
furnish the resale package, or any portion thereof, as required by this
section.
3. Within 10 calendar days after receipt of a written request by
a unit’s owner or his or her authorized agent, the association shall
furnish all of the following to the unit’s owner or his or her
authorized agent for inclusion in the resale package:
(a) Copies of the documents required pursuant to paragraphs (a)
, [and] (c) and (g) of subsection 1; and
(b) A certificate containing the information necessary to enable
the unit’s owner to comply with paragraphs (b), (d), (e) and (f) of
subsection 1.
4. If the association furnishes the documents and certificate
pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) The unit’s owner or his or her authorized agent shall include
the documents and certificate in the resale package provided to the
purchaser, and neither the unit’s owner nor his or her authorized
agent is liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information
provided by the association and included in the documents and
certificate.
(b) The association may charge the unit’s owner a reasonable
fee to cover the cost of preparing the certificate furnished pursuant
to subsection 3. Such a fee must be based on the actual cost the
association incurs to fulfill the requirements of this section in
preparing the certificate and must not exceed $185, except that if a
unit’s owner or an authorized agent thereof requests that the
-
*SB433*

– 25 –
certificate be furnished sooner than 3 business days after the date of
the request, the association may charge a fee, which must not exceed
$100, to expedite the preparation of the certificate. The amount of
the fee may increase, on an annual basis, by a percentage equal to
the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index (All Items)
published by the United States Department of Labor for the
preceding calendar year, but must not increase by more than 3
percent each year.
(c) The other documents furnished pursuant to subsection 3
must be provided in electronic format to the unit’s owner. If the
association is unable to provide such documents in electronic
format, the association may charge the unit’s owner a reasonable
fee, not to exceed 25 cents per page for the first 10 pages, and 10
cents per page thereafter, to cover the cost of copying.
(d) Except for the fees allowed pursuant to paragraphs (b) and
(c), the association may not charge the unit’s owner any other fees
for preparing or furnishing the documents and certificate pursuant to
subsection 3.
5. Neither a purchaser nor the purchaser’s interest in a unit is
liable for any unpaid assessment or fee greater than the amount set
forth in the documents and certificate prepared by the association. If
the association fails to furnish the documents and certificate within
the 10 calendar days allowed by this section, the purchaser is not
liable for the delinquent assessment. A resale package provided to a
unit’s owner or his or her authorized agent pursuant to this section
remains effective for 90 calendar days.
6. Upon the request of a unit’s owner or his or her authorized
agent, or upon the request of a purchaser to whom the unit’s owner
has provided a resale package pursuant to this section or his or her
authorized agent, the association shall make the entire study of the
reserves of the association which is required by NRS 116.31152
reasonably available for the unit’s owner, purchaser or authorized
agent to inspect, examine, photocopy and audit. The study must be
made available at the business office of the association or some
other suitable location within the county where the common-interest
community is situated or, if it is situated in more than one county,
within one of those counties.
7. A unit’s owner, the authorized agent of the unit’s owner or
the holder of a security interest on the unit may request a statement
of demand from the association. Not later than 10 calendar days
after receipt of a written request from the unit’s owner, the
authorized agent of the unit’s owner or the holder of a security
interest on the unit for a statement of demand, the association shall
furnish a statement of demand to the person who requested the
statement and provide a copy of the statement to any other interested
-
*SB433*

– 26 –
party. The association may charge a fee of not more than $165 to
prepare and furnish a statement of demand pursuant to this
subsection and an additional fee of not more than $100 to furnish a
statement of demand within 3 business days after receipt of a written
request for a statement of demand. The amount of the fees for
preparing and furnishing a statement of demand and the additional
fee for furnishing a statement of demand within 3 business days may
increase, on an annual basis, by a percentage equal to the percentage
of increase in the Consumer Price Index (All Items) published by
the United States Department of Labor for the preceding calendar
year, but must not increase by more than 3 percent each year. The
statement of demand:
(a) Must set forth the amount of the monthly assessment for
common expenses and any unpaid obligation of any kind, including,
without limitation, management fees, transfer fees, fines, penalties,
interest, collection costs, foreclosure fees and attorney’s fees
currently due from the selling unit’s owner; and
(b) Remains effective for the period specified in the statement of
demand, which must not be less than 15 business days after the date
of delivery by the association to the unit’s owner, the authorized
agent of the unit’s owner or the holder of a security interest on the
unit, whichever is applicable.
 As used in this subsection, “interested party” includes the unit’s
owner selling the unit and the prospective purchaser of the unit.
8. In preparing, copying, furnishing or expediting or otherwise
providing any document or other item pursuant to this section, an
association, or entity related to or acting on behalf of an association,
shall not charge a unit’s owner, the authorized agent of a unit’s
owner, a purchaser or, pursuant to subsection 7, the holder of a
security interest on a unit, any fee:
(a) Not authorized in this section; or
(b) In an amount which exceeds any limit set forth in this
section.
9. If the association becomes aware of an error in a statement
of demand furnished pursuant to subsection 7 during the period in
which the statement of demand is effective but before the
consummation of a resale for which a resale package was furnished
pursuant to subsection 1, the association must deliver a replacement
statement of demand to the person who requested the statement of
demand. Unless the person who requested the statement of demand
receives a replacement statement of demand, the person may rely
upon the accuracy of the information set forth in the statement of
demand provided by the association for the resale. Payment of the
amount set forth in the statement of demand constitutes full payment
of the amount due from the selling unit’s owner.
-
*SB433*

– 27 –
Sec. 33. NRS 116.4117 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.4117 1. Subject to the requirements set forth in
subsection 2, if a declarant, community manager or any other person
subject to this chapter fails to comply with any of its provisions or
any provision of the declaration or bylaws, any person or class of
persons suffering actual damages from the failure to comply may
bring a civil action for damages or other appropriate relief.
2. Subject to the requirements set forth in NRS 38.310 and
except as otherwise provided in NRS 116.3111, a civil action for
damages or other appropriate relief for a failure or refusal to comply
with any provision of this chapter or the governing documents of an
association may be brought:
(a) By the association against:
(1) A declarant;
(2) A community manager; or
(3) A unit’s owner.
(b) By a unit’s owner against:
(1) The association;
(2) A declarant; or
(3) Another unit’s owner of the association.
(c) By a class of units’ owners constituting at least 10 percent of
the total number of voting members of the association against a
community manager.
3. Members of the executive board are not personally liable to
the victims of crimes occurring on the property.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, punitive
damages may be awarded for a willful and material failure to
comply with any provision of this chapter if the failure is established
by clear and convincing evidence.
5. Punitive damages may not be awarded against:
(a) The association;
(b) The members of the executive board for acts or omissions
that occur in their official capacity as members of the executive
board; or
(c) The officers of the association for acts or omissions that
occur in their capacity as officers of the association.
6. The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the
prevailing party.
7. The civil remedy provided by this section is in addition to,
and not exclusive of, any other available remedy or penalty.
8. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the
Commission from taking any disciplinary action against a member
of an executive board pursuant to NRS [116.745] 116.750 to
116.795, inclusive.
-
*SB433*

– 28 –
Sec. 34. NRS 116.625 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.625 1. The Office of the Ombudsman for Owners in
Common-Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels is hereby
created within the Division.
2. The Administrator shall appoint the Ombudsman. The
Ombudsman is in the unclassified service of the State.
3. The Ombudsman must be qualified by training and
experience to perform the duties and functions of office.
4. In addition to any other duties set forth in this chapter, the
Ombudsman shall:
(a) Assist in processing claims submitted to mediation or
arbitration [or referred to a program] pursuant to NRS 38.300 to
38.360, inclusive;
(b) Assist owners in common-interest communities and
condominium hotels to understand their rights and responsibilities
as set forth in this chapter and chapter 116B of NRS and the
governing documents of their associations, including, without
limitation, publishing materials related to those rights and
responsibilities;
(c) Assist members of executive boards and officers of
associations to carry out their duties;
(d) When appropriate, investigate disputes involving the
provisions of this chapter or chapter 116B of NRS or the governing
documents of an association and assist in resolving such disputes;
and
(e) Compile and maintain a registration of each association
organized within the State which includes, without limitation, the
following information:
(1) The name, address and telephone number of the
association;
(2) The name of each community manager for the common-
interest community or the association of a condominium hotel and
the name of any other person who is authorized to manage the
property at the site of the common-interest community or
condominium hotel;
(3) The names, mailing addresses and telephone numbers of
the members of the executive board of the association;
(4) The name of the declarant;
(5) The number of units in the common-interest community
or condominium hotel;
(6) The total annual assessment made by the association;
(7) The number of foreclosures which were completed on
units within the common-interest community or condominium hotel
and which were based on liens for the failure of the unit’s owner to
-
*SB433*

– 29 –
pay any assessments levied against the unit or any fines imposed
against the unit’s owner; and
(8) Whether the study of the reserves of the association has
been conducted pursuant to NRS 116.31152 or 116B.605 and, if so,
the date on which it was completed.
Sec. 35. NRS 116.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.630 1. There is hereby created the Account for Common-
Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels in the State General
Fund. The Account must be administered by the Administrator.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, all money
received by the Commission, a hearing panel or the Division
pursuant to this chapter or chapter 116B of NRS, including, without
limitation, the fees collected pursuant to NRS 116.31155 and
116B.620, must be deposited into the Account.
3. If the Commission imposes a fine or penalty, the
Commission shall deposit the money collected from the imposition
of the fine or penalty with the State Treasurer for credit to the State
General Fund. If the money is so deposited, the Commission may
present a claim to the State Board of Examiners for recommendation
to the Interim Finance Committee if money is required to pay
attorney’s fees or the costs of an investigation, or both.
4. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
5. The money in the Account must be used solely to defray:
(a) The costs and expenses of the Commission and the Office of
the Ombudsman;
(b) If authorized by the Commission or any regulations adopted
by the Commission, the costs and expenses of subsidizing
proceedings for mediation [,] and arbitration [and a program]
conducted pursuant to NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive; and
(c) If authorized by the Legislature or by the Interim Finance
Committee if the Legislature is not in session, the costs and
expenses of administering the Division.
Sec. 36. NRS 116.665 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.665 1. The Commission shall conduct such hearings and
other proceedings as are required by the provisions of this chapter.
2. The Commission shall collect and maintain or cause to be
collected and maintained accurate information relating to:
(a) The number and kind of common-interest communities in
this State;
(b) The effect of the provisions of this chapter and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto on the development and
construction of common-interest communities, the residential
-
*SB433*

– 30 –
lending market for units within common-interest communities and
the operation and management of common-interest communities;
(c) Violations of the provisions of this chapter and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(d) The accessibility and use of, and the costs related to, the
arbitration [,] and mediation [and program] procedures set forth in
NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, and the decisions rendered and
awards made pursuant to those procedures;
(e) The number of foreclosures which were completed on units
within common-interest communities and which were based on liens
for the failure of the unit’s owner to pay any assessments levied
against the unit or any fines imposed against the unit’s owner;
(f) The study of the reserves required by NRS 116.31152; and
(g) Other issues that the Commission determines are of concern
to units’ owners, associations, community managers, developers and
other persons affected by common-interest communities.
3. The Commission shall develop and promote:
(a) Educational guidelines for conducting the elections of the
members of an executive board, the meetings of an executive board
and the meetings of the units’ owners of an association; and
(b) Educational guidelines for the enforcement of the governing
documents of an association through liens, penalties and fines.
4. The Commission shall recommend and approve for
accreditation programs of education and research relating to
common-interest communities, including, without limitation:
(a) The management of common-interest communities;
(b) The sale and resale of units within common-interest
communities;
(c) Alternative methods that may be used to resolve disputes
relating to common-interest communities; and
(d) The enforcement, including by foreclosure, of liens on units
within common-interest communities for the failure of the unit’s
owner to pay any assessments levied against the unit or any fines
imposed against the unit’s owner.
Sec. 37. NRS 116.670 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.670 The Commission may:
1. By regulation, establish standards for subsidizing
proceedings for mediation [,] and arbitration [and a program]
conducted pursuant to NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, to ensure
that such proceedings are not lengthy and are affordable and readily
accessible to all parties;
2. By regulation, establish standards for subsidizing
educational programs for the benefit of units’ owners, members of
executive boards and officers of associations;
3. Accept any gifts, grants or donations; and
-
*SB433*

– 31 –
4. Enter into agreements with other entities that are required or
authorized to carry out similar duties in this State or in other
jurisdictions and cooperate with such entities to develop uniform
procedures for carrying out the provisions of this chapter and for
accumulating information needed to carry out those provisions.
Sec. 38. NRS 116.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.750 1. In carrying out the provisions of NRS [116.745]
116.750 to 116.795, inclusive, the Division and the Ombudsman
have jurisdiction to investigate and the Commission and each
hearing panel has jurisdiction to take appropriate action against any
person who commits a violation, including, without limitation:
(a) Any association and any officer, employee or agent of an
association.
(b) Any member of an executive board.
(c) Any community manager who holds a certificate and any
other community manager.
(d) Any person who is registered as a reserve study specialist, or
who conducts a study of reserves, pursuant to chapter 116A of NRS.
(e) Any declarant or affiliate of a declarant.
(f) Any unit’s owner.
(g) Any tenant of a unit’s owner if the tenant has entered into an
agreement with the unit’s owner to abide by the governing
documents of the association and the provisions of this chapter and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. The jurisdiction set forth in subsection 1 applies to any
officer, employee or agent of an association or any member of an
executive board who commits a violation and who:
(a) Currently holds his or her office, employment, agency or
position or who held the office, employment, agency or position at
the commencement of proceedings against him or her.
(b) Resigns his or her office, employment, agency or position:
(1) After the commencement of proceedings against him or
her; or
(2) Within 1 year after the violation is discovered or
reasonably should have been discovered.
Sec. 39. NRS 116.755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.755 1. The rights, remedies and penalties provided by
NRS [116.745] 116.750 to 116.795, inclusive, are cumulative and
do not abrogate and are in addition to any other rights, remedies and
penalties that may exist at law or in equity.
2. If the Commission, a hearing panel or another agency or
officer elects to take a particular action or pursue a particular
remedy or penalty authorized by NRS [116.745] 116.750 to
116.795, inclusive, or another specific statute, that election is not
exclusive and does not preclude the Commission, the hearing panel
-
*SB433*

– 32 –
or another agency or officer from taking any other actions or
pursuing any other remedies or penalties authorized by NRS
[116.745] 116.750 to 116.795, inclusive, or another specific statute.
3. In carrying out the provisions of NRS [116.745] 116.750 to
116.795, inclusive, the Commission or a hearing panel shall not
intervene in any internal activities of an association except to the
extent necessary to prevent or remedy a violation.
Sec. 40. NRS 116.757 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.757 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 239.0115, a written affidavit filed with the Division pursuant
to NRS 116.760, all documents and other information filed with the
written affidavit and all documents and other information compiled
as a result of an investigation conducted to determine whether to file
a formal complaint with the Commission are confidential. The
Division shall not disclose any information that is confidential
pursuant to this subsection, in whole or in part, to any person,
including, without limitation, a person who is the subject of an
investigation or complaint, unless and until a formal complaint is
filed pursuant to subsection 2 and the disclosure is required pursuant
to subsection 2.
2. A formal complaint filed by the Administrator with the
Commission and all documents and other information considered by
the Commission or a hearing panel when determining whether to
impose discipline or take other administrative action pursuant to
NRS [116.745] 116.750 to 116.795, inclusive, are public records.
Sec. 41. NRS 116.760 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.760 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person who is aggrieved by an alleged violation may, not later than
1 year after the person discovers or reasonably should have
discovered the alleged violation, file with the Division a written
affidavit that sets forth the facts constituting the alleged violation.
The affidavit may allege any actual damages suffered by the
aggrieved person as a result of the alleged violation.
2. An aggrieved person may not file such an affidavit unless
the aggrieved person has provided the respondent by certified mail,
return receipt requested, with written notice of the alleged violation
set forth in the affidavit. The notice must:
(a) Be mailed to the respondent’s last known address.
(b) Specify, in reasonable detail, the alleged violation, any
actual damages suffered by the aggrieved person as a result of the
alleged violation, and any corrective action proposed by the
aggrieved person.
3. A written affidavit filed with the Division pursuant to this
section must be:
(a) On a form prescribed by the Division.
-
*SB433*

– 33 –
(b) Accompanied by evidence that:
(1) The respondent has been given a reasonable opportunity
after receiving the written notice to correct the alleged violation; and
(2) Reasonable efforts to resolve the alleged violation have
failed.
4. If the Division determines that:
(a) The allegations in the affidavit are not vexatious,
misleading, retaliatory, frivolous, false or fraudulent; and
(b) The alleged violation, if assumed to be true, would
constitute a violation,
 the Division shall refer the affidavit to the Ombudsman.
5. The Commission or a hearing panel may impose either or
both of the following:
(a) An administrative fine of not more than $10,000; or
(b) Sanctions disqualifying a person from serving as a member
of the executive board for a period of not more than 10 years,
 against any person who [knowingly] files a vexatious,
misleading, retaliatory, frivolous, false or fraudulent affidavit with
the Division.
[5. The Commission or a hearing panel may designate a person
as a vexatious affiant if the Commission or a hearing panel has
imposed an administrative fine or sanctions against the person
pursuant to subsection 4 for knowingly filing a false or fraudulent
affidavit with the Division on two or more occasions. If the
Commission or a hearing panel has designated a person as a
vexatious affiant pursuant to this subsection, the Commission or
hearing panel shall transmit a copy of the order designating the
person as a vexatious affiant to the Division and the Division shall
not thereafter accept an affidavit filed by the person unless:
(a) The person first submits a copy of the affidavit to the
Ombudsman; and
(b) After reviewing the affidavit, the Ombudsman grants leave
for the person to file the affidavit with the Division.]
Sec. 42. NRS 116.765 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.765 1. Upon receipt of an affidavit that complies with
the provisions of NRS 116.760, the [Division shall refer the
affidavit to the Ombudsman.
2. The] Ombudsman shall give such guidance to the parties as
the Ombudsman deems necessary to assist the parties to resolve the
alleged violation.
[3.] 2. If the parties are unable to resolve the alleged violation
with the assistance of the Ombudsman, the Ombudsman shall
provide to the Division a report concerning the alleged violation and
any information collected by the Ombudsman during his or her
efforts to assist the parties to resolve the alleged violation.
-
*SB433*

– 34 –
[4.] 3. Upon receipt of the report from the Ombudsman, the
Division shall conduct an investigation to determine whether good
cause exists to proceed with a hearing on the alleged violation.
[5.] 4. If, after investigating the alleged violation, the Division
[determines] reasonably believes that [the] :
(a) The allegations in the affidavit are [not frivolous, false or
fraudulent and that good] supported by probable cause [exists to
proceed with a hearing on the alleged violation,] ;
(b) The admissible evidence is sufficient to support sanctions
against the respondent by a preponderance of the evidence; and
(c) A decision to file a formal complaint with the Commission
is in the best interests of justice and associations in this State,
 the Administrator shall file a formal complaint with the
Commission and schedule a hearing on the complaint before the
Commission or a hearing panel.
Sec. 43. NRS 116.785 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.785 1. If the Commission or the hearing panel, after
notice and hearing, finds that the respondent has committed a
violation, the Commission or the hearing panel may take any or all
of the following actions:
(a) Issue an order directing the respondent to cease and desist
from continuing to engage in the unlawful conduct that resulted in
the violation.
(b) Issue an order directing the respondent to take affirmative
action to correct any conditions resulting from the violation.
(c) Impose an administrative fine of not more than $1,000 for
each violation.
2. If the respondent is a member of an executive board or an
officer of an association, the Commission or the hearing panel may
order the respondent removed from his or her office or position and
prohibited from serving on the executive board of an association
for a period not to exceed 10 years if the Commission or the
hearing panel, after notice and hearing, finds that:
(a) The respondent has knowingly and willfully committed a
violation; and
(b) The removal is in the best interest of the association.
3. If the respondent violates any order issued by the
Commission or the hearing panel pursuant to this section, the
Commission or the hearing panel, after notice and hearing, may
impose an administrative fine of not more than $1,000 for each
violation.
4. If the Commission or the hearing panel takes any
disciplinary action pursuant to this section, the Commission or the
hearing panel may order the respondent to pay the costs of the
proceedings incurred by the Division, including, without limitation,
-
*SB433*

– 35 –
the cost of the investigation and reasonable attorney’s fees [.] , after
providing due process to the respondent through an opportunity to
review and dispute such costs.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, unless
the respondent has knowingly and willfully committed a violation, if
the respondent is a member of an executive board or an officer of an
association:
(a) The association is liable for all fines and costs imposed
against the respondent pursuant to this section; and
(b) The respondent may not be held personally liable for those
fines and costs.
Sec. 44. NRS 116.793 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116.793 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS [116.745]
116.750 to 116.795, inclusive, a person who is aggrieved by an
alleged violation of subsection 6 of NRS 116.3102 or subsection 8
of NRS 116.4109 may file with the Division a written complaint
that sets forth the facts constituting the alleged violation. The
complaint may allege any actual damages suffered by the aggrieved
person as a result of the alleged violation.
2. The Division shall:
(a) Review a complaint filed pursuant to subsection 1 in a timely
manner.
(b) If circumstances warrant, issue to the person who is alleged
to have committed the violation a notice requesting a written
response and proof of corrective action, including, without
limitation, the reimbursement of any excessive fees to the aggrieved
person.
3. Failure to respond to a notice issued pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 2 within 30 days after receipt of the notice:
(a) Shall be deemed to be an admission of the violation; and
(b) Is punishable by an administrative fine in the amount of
$250.
Sec. 45. NRS 116B.815 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116B.815 The Office of the Ombudsman for Owners in
Common-Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels created
by NRS 116.625 shall:
1. Assist in processing claims arising under this chapter that
are submitted to mediation or arbitration [or referred to a program]
pursuant to NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive;
2. Assist owners in condominium hotels to understand their
rights and responsibilities as set forth in this chapter and the
governing documents of their associations, including, without
limitation, publishing materials related to those rights and
responsibilities;
-
*SB433*

– 36 –
3. Assist members of executive boards and officers of
associations to carry out their duties;
4. When appropriate, investigate disputes involving the
provisions of this chapter or the governing documents of an
association and assist in resolving such disputes; and
5. Compile and maintain a registration of each association
organized within the State which includes, without limitation, the
following information:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the association;
(b) The names, mailing addresses and telephone numbers of the
members of the executive board of the association;
(c) The name of the declarant;
(d) The name of the hotel unit owner;
(e) The number of units in the condominium hotel;
(f) The total annual assessment made by the association; and
(g) The number of foreclosures which were completed on units
within the condominium hotel and which were based on liens for the
failure of the unit’s owner to pay any assessments levied against the
unit or any fines imposed against the unit’s owner.
Sec. 46. NRS 116B.845 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116B.845 1. The Commission shall conduct such hearings
and other proceedings as are required by the provisions of this
chapter.
2. The Commission shall collect and maintain or cause to be
collected and maintained accurate information relating to:
(a) The number of condominium hotels in this State;
(b) The effect of the provisions of this chapter and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto on the development and
construction of condominium hotels, the residential lending market
for units within condominium hotels and the operation and
management of condominium hotels;
(c) Violations of the provisions of this chapter and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(d) The accessibility and use of, and the costs related to, the
arbitration [,] and mediation [and program] procedures set forth in
NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, and the decisions rendered and
awards made pursuant to those procedures;
(e) The number of foreclosures which were completed on units
within condominium hotels and which were based on liens for the
failure of the unit’s owner to pay any assessments levied against the
unit or any fines imposed against the unit’s owner; and
(f) Other issues that the Commission determines are of concern
to units’ owners, associations, developers and other persons affected
by condominium hotels.
3. The Commission shall develop and promote:
-
*SB433*

– 37 –
(a) Educational guidelines for conducting the elections of the
members of an executive board, the meetings of an executive board
and the meetings of the units’ owners of an association; and
(b) Educational guidelines for the enforcement of the governing
documents of an association through liens, penalties and fines.
4. The Commission shall recommend and approve for
accreditation programs of education and research relating to
condominium hotels, including, without limitation:
(a) The management of condominium hotels;
(b) The sale and resale of units within condominium hotels;
(c) Alternative methods that may be used to resolve disputes
relating to condominium hotels; and
(d) The enforcement, including by foreclosure, of liens on units
within condominium hotels for the failure of the unit’s owner to pay
any assessments levied against the unit or any fines imposed against
the unit’s owner.
Sec. 47. NRS 116B.850 is hereby amended to read as follows:
116B.850 The Commission may:
1. By regulation, establish standards for subsidizing
proceedings for mediation [,] and arbitration [and a program]
conducted pursuant to NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, to ensure
that such proceedings are not lengthy and are affordable and readily
accessible to all parties;
2. By regulation, establish standards for subsidizing
educational programs for the benefit of units’ owners, members of
executive boards and officers of associations;
3. Accept any gifts, grants or donations; and
4. Enter into agreements with other entities that are required or
authorized to carry out similar duties in this State or in other
jurisdictions and cooperate with such entities to develop uniform
procedures for carrying out the provisions of this chapter and for
accumulating information needed to carry out those provisions.
Sec. 48. NRS 38.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.300 As used in NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, unless the
context otherwise requires:
1. “Assessments” means:
(a) Any charge which an association may impose against an
owner of residential property pursuant to a declaration of covenants,
conditions and restrictions, including any late charges, interest and
costs of collecting the charges; and
(b) Any penalties, fines, fees and other charges which may be
imposed by an association pursuant to paragraphs (j) to (o),
inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 116.3102 or subsections 10, 11
and 12 of NRS 116B.420.
-
*SB433*

– 38 –
2. “Association” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
116.011 or 116B.030.
3. “Civil action” includes an action for money damages or
equitable relief. The term does not include an action in equity for
injunctive relief in which there is an immediate threat of irreparable
harm, or an action relating to the title to residential property.
4. “Division” means the Real Estate Division of the
Department of Business and Industry.
5. [“Program” means a program established by the Division
under which a person, including, without limitation, a referee or
hearing officer, can render decisions on disputes relating to:
(a) The interpretation, application or enforcement of any
covenants, conditions or restrictions applicable to residential
property or any bylaws, rules or regulations adopted by an
association; or
(b) The procedures used for increasing, decreasing or imposing
additional assessments upon residential property.
6.] “Residential property” includes, but is not limited to, real
estate within a planned community subject to the provisions of
chapter 116 of NRS or real estate within a condominium hotel
subject to the provisions of chapter 116B of NRS. The term does not
include commercial property if no portion thereof contains property
which is used for residential purposes.
Sec. 49. NRS 38.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.310 1. No civil action based upon a claim relating to:
(a) The interpretation, application or enforcement of any
covenants, conditions or restrictions applicable to residential
property or any bylaws, rules or regulations adopted by an
association; or
(b) The procedures used for increasing, decreasing or imposing
additional assessments upon residential property,
 may be commenced in any court in this State unless the action
has been submitted to mediation or [, if the parties agree, has been
referred to a program] arbitration pursuant to the provisions of NRS
38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, and, if the civil action concerns real
estate within a planned community subject to the provisions of
chapter 116 of NRS or real estate within a condominium hotel
subject to the provisions of chapter 116B of NRS, all administrative
procedures specified in any covenants, conditions or restrictions
applicable to the property or in any bylaws, rules and regulations of
an association have been exhausted.
2. A court shall dismiss any civil action which is commenced
in violation of the provisions of subsection 1.
-
*SB433*

– 39 –
Sec. 50. NRS 38.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.320 1. Any civil action described in NRS 38.310 must be
submitted to mediation or [referred to a program] arbitration by
filing a written claim with the Division. The claim must include:
(a) The complete names, addresses and telephone numbers of all
parties to the claim;
(b) A specific statement of the nature of the claim;
(c) A statement of whether the person wishes to have the claim
[referred] submitted to [a program;] mediation or arbitration and, if
the person wishes to have the claim submitted to arbitration,
whether the person agrees to binding arbitration; and
(d) Such other information as the Division may require.
2. The written claim must be accompanied by a filing fee of
$50.
3. Upon the filing of the written claim, the claimant shall serve
a copy of the claim in the manner prescribed in Rule 4 of the
Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of a summons and
complaint. The claim so served must be accompanied by a statement
explaining the procedures for mediation and [for a program]
arbitration set forth in NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive.
4. Upon being served pursuant to subsection 3, the person upon
whom a copy of the written claim was served shall, within 30 days
after the date of service, file a written answer with the Division,
which must include a statement of whether the person wishes to
have the claim [referred to a program.] submitted to mediation or
arbitration. The answer must be accompanied by a filing fee of $50.
Sec. 51. NRS 38.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.325 [If the Division establishes a program:]
1. Upon receipt of a written claim and answer filed pursuant to
NRS 38.320 in which all the parties indicate that they wish to have
the claim [referred to such a program,] submitted to mediation or
arbitration, as applicable, the Division may [refer] so submit the
[parties to the program.] claim.
2. The person to whom the [parties are referred pursuant to the
program] claim is submitted shall review the claim and answer filed
pursuant to NRS 38.320 and, unless the parties agree to waive a
hearing, conduct a hearing on the claim. After reviewing the claim
and the answer and, if required, conducting a hearing on the claim,
the person shall issue a written decision and award and provide a
copy of the written decision and award to the parties. The person
may not award to either party costs or attorney’s fees.
3. Any party may, within 60 days after receiving the written
decision and award pursuant to subsection 2, commence a civil
action in the proper court concerning the claim. Any complaint filed
in such an action must contain a sworn statement indicating that the
-
*SB433*

– 40 –
issues addressed in the complaint have been [referred to a program]
submitted to mediation or arbitration, as applicable, pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive. If such an action
is not commenced within 60 days after receiving the written
decision and award pursuant to subsection 2, any party may, within
1 year after receiving the written decision and award, apply to the
proper court for a confirmation of the written decision and award
pursuant to NRS 38.239.
Sec. 52. NRS 38.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.330 1. [Unless a program has been established and the] If
all parties [have elected] named in a written claim filed pursuant to
NRS 38.320 agree to have the claim [referred to a program,]
submitted for mediation, the parties shall reduce the agreement to
writing and select a mediator from the list of mediators maintained
by the Division pursuant to NRS 38.340. Any mediator selected
must be available within the geographic area. If the parties fail to
agree upon a mediator, the Division shall appoint a mediator from
the list of mediators maintained by the Division. Any mediator
appointed must be available within the geographic area. Unless
otherwise provided by an agreement of the parties, mediation must
be completed within 60 days after [the filing of the written claim.
Not later than 5 days before mediation is scheduled to be conducted,
each party must submit to the mediator a written statement which
sets forth the issues in dispute. Mediation must not exceed 3 hours,
unless] the parties agree to [an extension of such time.] mediation.
Any agreement obtained through mediation conducted pursuant to
this section must, within 20 days after the conclusion of mediation,
be reduced to writing by the mediator and a copy thereof provided
to each party. The agreement may be enforced as any other written
agreement. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the parties
are responsible for [the cost] all costs of mediation conducted
pursuant to this section . [, which must not exceed $500 for 3 hours
of mediation. If the parties agree to extend mediation beyond 3
hours pursuant to this subsection, the fee for the additional hours
must not exceed $200 per hour.] If the parties participate in
mediation and an agreement is not obtained, any party may
commence a civil action in the proper court concerning the claim
that was submitted to mediation. Any complaint filed in such an
action must contain a sworn statement indicating that the issues
addressed in the complaint have been mediated pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, but an agreement
was not obtained.
2. [Before commencing a civil action in the proper court, the]
If all parties named in the claim [may] do not agree to [arbitration if
the parties have participated in mediation in which an agreement
-
*SB433*

– 41 –
was not obtained or if a written decision and award have been issued
pursuant to NRS 38.325. Unless the parties agree in writing to
binding arbitration, the arbitration is nonbinding. The cost of
arbitration conducted pursuant to this section must not exceed $300
per hour. If] mediation, the parties [agree to arbitration, they] shall
select an arbitrator from the list of arbitrators maintained by the
Division pursuant to NRS 38.340. Any arbitrator selected must be
available within the geographic area. If the parties fail to agree upon
an arbitrator, the Division shall appoint an arbitrator from the list
maintained by the Division. Any arbitrator appointed must be
available within the geographic area. Upon appointing an arbitrator,
the Division shall provide the name of the arbitrator to each party.
An arbitrator shall, not later than 5 days after the arbitrator’s
selection or appointment pursuant to this subsection, provide to the
parties an informational statement relating to the arbitration of a
claim pursuant to this section. The written informational statement:
(a) Must be written in plain English;
(b) Must explain the procedures and applicable law relating to
the arbitration of a claim conducted pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, the procedures, timelines and
applicable law relating to confirmation of an award pursuant to NRS
38.239, vacation of an award pursuant to NRS 38.241, judgment on
an award pursuant to NRS 38.243, and any applicable statute or
court rule governing the award of attorney’s fees or costs to any
party; and
(c) Must be accompanied by a separate form acknowledging that
the party has received and read the informational statement, which
must be returned to the arbitrator by the party not later than 10 days
after receipt of the informational statement.
3. The Division may provide for the payment of the fees for a
mediator or an arbitrator selected or appointed pursuant to this
section from the Account for Common-Interest Communities and
Condominium Hotels created by NRS 116.630, to the extent that:
(a) The Commission for Common-Interest Communities and
Condominium Hotels approves the payment; and
(b) There is money available in the Account for this purpose.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this section and except
where inconsistent with the provisions of NRS 38.300 to 38.360,
inclusive, the arbitration of a claim pursuant to this section must be
conducted in accordance with the provisions of NRS 38.231,
38.232, 38.233, 38.236 to 38.239, inclusive, 38.242 and 38.243. At
any time during the arbitration of a claim relating to the
interpretation, application or enforcement of any covenants,
conditions or restrictions applicable to residential property or any
bylaws, rules or regulations adopted by an association, the arbitrator
-
*SB433*

– 42 –
may issue an order prohibiting the action upon which the claim is
based. An award must be made within 30 days after the conclusion
of arbitration, unless a shorter period is agreed upon by the parties to
the arbitration.
5. If all the parties [have agreed] do not agree to binding
arbitration , [but have not agreed whether the arbitration will be
binding or nonbinding,] the arbitration will be nonbinding [. If
arbitration is nonbinding,] , and any party to the nonbinding
arbitration may, within 30 days after a final decision and award
which are dispositive of any and all issues of the claim which were
submitted to nonbinding arbitration have been served upon the
parties, commence a civil action in the proper court concerning the
claim which was submitted for arbitration. Any complaint filed in
such an action must contain a sworn statement indicating that the
issues addressed in the complaint have been arbitrated pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive. If such an action
is not commenced within that period, any party to the arbitration
may, within 1 year after the service of the award, apply to the proper
court for a confirmation of the award pursuant to NRS 38.239.
6. If all the parties agree in writing to binding arbitration, the
arbitration must be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter. An award procured pursuant to such binding arbitration
may be vacated and a rehearing granted upon application of a party
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 38.241.
7. If, after the conclusion of binding arbitration, a party:
(a) Applies to have an award vacated and a rehearing granted
pursuant to NRS 38.241; or
(b) Commences a civil action based upon any claim which was
the subject of arbitration,
 the party shall, if the party fails to obtain a more favorable award
or judgment than that which was obtained in the initial binding
arbitration, pay all costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by
the opposing party after the application for a rehearing was made or
after the complaint in the civil action was filed.
8. Upon request by a party, the Division shall provide a
statement to the party indicating the amount of the fees for a
mediator or an arbitrator selected or appointed pursuant to this
section.
9. As used in this section, “geographic area” means an area
within 150 miles from any residential property or association which
is the subject of a written claim submitted pursuant to NRS 38.320.
Sec. 53. NRS 38.340 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.340 For the purposes of NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive,
the Division shall establish and maintain:
-
*SB433*

– 43 –
1. A list of mediators and arbitrators who are available for
mediation and arbitration of claims. The list must include mediators
and arbitrators who, as determined by the Division, have received
training and experience in mediation or arbitration and in the
resolution of disputes concerning associations, including, without
limitation, the interpretation, application and enforcement of
covenants, conditions and restrictions pertaining to residential
property and the articles of incorporation, bylaws, rules and
regulations of an association. In establishing and maintaining the
list, the Division may use lists of qualified persons maintained by
any organization which provides mediation or arbitration services.
Before including a mediator or arbitrator on a list established and
maintained pursuant to this section, the Division may require the
mediator or arbitrator to present proof satisfactory to the Division
that the mediator or arbitrator has received the training and
experience required for mediators or arbitrators pursuant to this
section.
2. A document which contains a written explanation of the
procedures for mediating and arbitrating claims [and for a program]
pursuant to NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive.
Sec. 54. NRS 38.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
38.350 Any statute of limitations applicable to a claim
described in NRS 38.310 is tolled from the time the claim is
submitted to mediation or arbitration [or referred to a program]
pursuant to NRS 38.300 to 38.360, inclusive, until the conclusion of
mediation or arbitration of the claim and the period for vacating the
award has expired . [, or until the issuance of a written decision and
award pursuant to the program.]
Sec. 55. NRS 40.615 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.615 “Constructional defect” means a defect in the design,
construction, manufacture, repair or landscaping of a new residence,
of an alteration of or addition to an existing residence, or of an
appurtenance and includes, without limitation, the design,
construction, manufacture, repair or landscaping of a new residence,
of an alteration of or addition to an existing residence, or of an
appurtenance:
1. Which presents an unreasonable risk of injury to a person or
property; [or]
2. Which is not completed in a good and workmanlike manner
and proximately causes physical damage to the residence, an
appurtenance or the real property to which the residence or
appurtenance is affixed [.] ; or
3. Which is not constructed:
(a) In accordance with applicable law, including, without
limitation, in violation of local codes or ordinances;
-
*SB433*

– 44 –
(b) According to sound standards of engineering and
construction; and
(c) In a workmanlike manner.
Sec. 56. NRS 40.655 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.655 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 40.650, in a
claim governed by NRS 40.600 to 40.695, inclusive, the claimant
may recover only the following damages to the extent proximately
caused by a constructional defect:
(a) The reasonable cost of any repairs already made that were
necessary and of any repairs yet to be made that are necessary to
cure any constructional defect that the contractor failed to cure and
the reasonable expenses of temporary housing reasonably necessary
during the repair;
(b) The reduction in market value of the residence or accessory
structure, if any, to the extent the reduction is because of structural
failure;
(c) The loss of the use of all or any part of the residence;
(d) The reasonable value of any other property damaged by the
constructional defect;
(e) Any additional costs reasonably incurred by the claimant,
including, but not limited to, any costs and fees incurred for the
retention of experts to:
(1) Ascertain the nature and extent of the constructional
defects;
(2) Evaluate appropriate corrective measures to estimate the
value of loss of use; and
(3) Estimate the value of loss of use, the cost of temporary
housing and the reduction of market value of the residence; [and]
(f) Any interest provided by statute [.] ; and
(g) Any reasonable attorney’s fees sufficient to place the
claimant in as good a position as the claimant would have been if
the constructional defect did not exist.
2. If a contractor complies with the provisions of NRS 40.600
to 40.695, inclusive, the claimant may not recover from the
contractor, as a result of the constructional defect, any damages
other than damages authorized pursuant to NRS 40.600 to 40.695,
inclusive.
3. This section must not be construed as impairing any
contractual rights between a contractor and a subcontractor, supplier
or design professional.
4. As used in this section, “structural failure” means physical
damage to the load-bearing portion of a residence or appurtenance
caused by a failure of the load-bearing portion of the residence or
appurtenance.
-
*SB433*

– 45 –
Sec. 57. 1. A covered building owner shall, not later than 2
years after the date on which sections 16 to 22, inclusive, of this act
become effective, retain a structural inspector to perform a structural
inspection of the building components of the primary load-bearing
system of a covered building for which a certificate of occupancy
was issued before the date on which sections 16 to 22, inclusive, of
this act become effective.
2. A structural inspector who performs a structural inspection
pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Review the construction plans submitted with the application
for a building permit for the covered building; and
(b) Issue a written report describing the condition of the primary
load-bearing system of the covered building. The written report
must comply with the requirements of subsections 2 to 5, inclusive,
of section 20 of this act and include a statement whether the primary
load-bearing system of the covered building conforms to the
construction plans.
3. If the structural inspector determines that the primary load-
bearing system of the covered building does not conform to the
construction plans, the covered building owner must provide
additional construction plans which conform to the modification of
the primary load-bearing system.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Covered building” has the meaning ascribed to it in section
5 of this act.
(b) “Covered building owner” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 6 of this act.
(c) “Primary load-bearing system” has the meaning ascribed to it
in section 10 of this act.
(d) “Structural inspection” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 11 of this act.
(e) “Structural inspector” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 12 of this act.
Sec. 58. The amendatory provisions of sections 55 and 56 of
this act apply to an action for a constructional defect filed pursuant
to NRS 40.600 to 40.695, inclusive, commenced before, on or after
the effective date of sections 55 and 56 of this act.
Sec. 59. NRS 116.745 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 60. 1. This section and sections 1, 3 to 6, inclusive, 8 to
13, inclusive, 15 to 27, inclusive, 31, 32 and 55 to 59, inclusive, of
this act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 2, 7, 14, 28, 29, 30, 33 to 54, inclusive, and 60 of
this act become effective on October 1, 2025.
-
*SB433*

– 46 –
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
116.745 “Violation” defined. As used in NRS 116.745 to
116.795, inclusive, unless the context otherwise requires,
“violation” means a violation of:
1. Any provision of this chapter except NRS 116.31184;
2. Any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter; or
3. Any order of the Commission or a hearing panel.
H
-
*SB433*